Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 8 Retirement Of Judges And Court Employees
24-8-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System;

“Consumer price index” means the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, in effect on January 1, 1999, except that if the consumer price index is subsequently reconstructed in a manner materially changing its character, the board, after receiving the advice of the actuary, shall change the application of the consumer price index so that, as far as practicable, the intent of the use of the consumer price index shall be continued;

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

“System” means the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-703. Creation of Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan.

A Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System is established pursuant to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-704. Membership generally.

Whether elected or appointed to office, all chancery, circuit, and circuit-chancery judges, judges of the Court of Appeals, and justices of the Supreme Court shall participate in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

A person who becomes a member of the system on or after July 30, 1999, shall participate in the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for the system.

Any active member who was a member of the system before July 30, 1999, shall have until the end of the term of office in which the member is serving on July 30, 1999, to elect coverage under the benefit provisions of this subchapter. A former member who was an active member on December 31, 1998, shall have until July 31, 1999, or ninety (90) days after July 30, 1999, whichever is later, to elect coverage under the benefit provisions of the subchapter. The election shall be made as directed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and shall be irrevocable.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-705. Members electing coverage.

A member electing coverage under this subchapter shall be entitled to:

A refund to the member for any credited service purchased under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System together with six percent (6%) interest compounded annually from the date of payment;

Restoration of service to another state-supported retirement system of any credited service that had been transferred to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System upon refunding to that system any sums transferred by that system along with six percent (6%) interest compounded annually from the date of the transfer; or

Substitute purchased service for actual service for which no member contribution was made, as provided under subsection (b) of this section.

A member or former member who elects coverage under this subchapter and who has accrued additional actual service prior to the date of transfer but after the date member contributions ceased shall pay to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System on the effective date of transfer the contributions that would have been paid on the additional actual service at the rate of five percent (5%) of the pay received along with six percent (6%) interest computed annually from the date the contributions would have been paid to the effective date of transfer. However, in no instance, shall the member be required to pay contributions on active service that would exceed the amount required in § 24-8-708.

If the member or former member has actual service for which no member contributions were made, then purchased service may be used to reduce the period of actual service for which payments are due under subdivision (b)(1) of this section. The purchased service may be subtracted from the period of actual service for which contributions were not made and the member or former member shall make payments only on the remaining period. However, purchased service shall not be substituted for contributions required for actual service occurring after the first twenty (20) years of actual service.

Purchased service substituted for actual service under subsection (b) of this section shall be the most expensive service purchased by the member.

If the member or former member has credited service remaining after making the substitution allowed under this subsection, the remaining credited service may be refunded under subdivision (a)(1) of this section or restored to another state system under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

Any purchased service substituted under subsection (b) of this section may not be used as credited service in another state-supported system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-706. Contributions — Members — Refund.

The contribution of each member of the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be five percent (5%) of each member's annual salary.

If a judge or justice ceases to be a member prior to qualifying for retirement benefits, he or she shall be entitled to a refund of all contributions paid by him or her into the system. If a judge or justice who has received a refund returns to covered employment under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System or a reciprocal system as defined in § 24-2-401(3), the person shall be eligible in accordance with methods and procedures established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System to repay the refund and restore the service forfeited when the refund was received.

For purposes of deferring federal and state income tax and pursuant to the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2), as adopted by § 26-51-414, the state shall pick up the members' contributions to the Judicial Retirement Fund under the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System. Member contributions picked up by the state shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of salary to a member. A deduction shall be made from each member's salary, equal to the amount of the member's contribution picked up by the employer. For all other purposes, member contributions picked up by the state shall be considered member contributions.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-707. Contributions — State.

The state, as employer, shall make contributions to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System of twelve percent (12%) of the active member payroll.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State is authorized and directed to make annual transfers each July 1 to the Judges Retirement Fund from the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund in an amount determined by computing the dollar amount required based on the actuarially determined employer rate in the most recent annual actuarial valuation and subtracting from that amount the statutory contribution amount specified in subsection (a) of this section, and further, reduced by the amount of the court cost revenue transferred to the Judges Retirement Fund from the State Administration of Justice Fund in accordance with § 16-10-310.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1; 2001, No. 763, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 6, provided: “The revised benefits which are adopted pursuant to this act shall be extended to current and future members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and to current retired members and current survivor annuitants of the system.”

24-8-708. Contributions — Cessation upon maximum benefit eligibility.

When a judge or justice has sufficient service to receive the maximum benefit under § 24-8-713(a), no further contribution shall be required.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-709. Actual service requirement.

Benefits and eligibility for benefits under this subchapter shall be based on actual service in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System. Laws allowing the purchase of credited service or providing free credited service shall not apply to this subchapter. However, the provisions of § 24-2-401 et seq. may be used to meet the service requirements of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1; 1999, No. 1067, § 4.

24-8-710. Eligibility for benefits — Retirement generally.

Any member who has a minimum of twenty (20) years of actual service may retire regardless of age, and any judge or justice who has served at least eight (8) years shall be eligible for benefits upon reaching age sixty-five (65).

Any judge or justice who becomes seventy (70) years of age during a term of office to which he or she has been elected may complete the term without forfeiting his or her rights to retirement benefits under this section.

Any judge or justice who is not eligible to retire at age seventy (70) may continue to serve as judge or justice until the completion of the term of office in which he or she has sufficient service to retire without losing his or her retirement benefits.

The judge or justice shall lose all retirement benefits if he or she serves beyond the end of the term needed to get sufficient service to retire.

Otherwise, judges or justices must retire by their seventieth birthday or lose their retirement benefits.

However, any active judge or justice who was serving prior to July 1, 1965, may continue to serve until any age and upon retirement shall be eligible to receive retirement benefits.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-711. Eligibility for benefits — Early retirement.

Any member of the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System who has eight (8) years or more of actual service in the system may elect to retire and receive retirement benefits at any time after reaching age sixty-two (62) and before reaching age sixty-five (65).

The retirement benefits of a member electing to retire before age sixty-five (65) with less than twenty (20) years of actual service shall be reduced six percent (6%) for each full year and proportionately for any part of a year that the judge or justice retires before reaching age sixty-five (65).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-712. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement.

Any member under the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System who has served a minimum of three (3) consecutive years as a member of the system shall receive retirement benefits if any incapacitating disability as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall occur during any term for which the judge or justice has been elected.

A judgment of disability should not be granted by the board until it is reasonably assured of a judge's or justice's permanent physical or mental incapacity to perform the duties of his or her judicial office.

The board should act only upon proper certification of incapacity by two (2) or more physicians.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-713. Retirement and survivors' benefits generally.

The retirement benefits to be paid an eligible and qualified member or retiree under the provisions of this section shall be an amount equal to three and two-tenths percent (3.2%) of annual salary payable to the last judicial office held multiplied by the number of years of actual service under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System but not to exceed an amount equal to eighty percent (80%) of salary. The retirement benefits shall be payable for the recipient's life.

Survivors' benefits shall be sixty-seven percent (67%) of the amount of the retirement benefits.

Upon the death of an active judge or justice who has served at least three (3) years, his or her survivors shall receive a sum equal to sixty-seven percent (67%) of the retirement benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Survivors' benefits shall be payable as follows:

If the decedent is survived by a spouse to whom he or she has been married for not less than one (1) year and with whom he or she is living at the time of his or her death, and if the decedent is not survived by any minor child or children, then the spouse shall draw for life or until remarriage a sum equal to sixty-seven percent (67%) of the benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section;

If the decedent is survived by both an eligible spouse and minor children, then one-half (½) of the survivors' benefits shall be paid to the spouse for life or until remarriage. The other one-half (½) of the survivors' benefits shall be paid to the guardian of the minor children during the period of minority.

When all of the children cease to be minors, then the survivors' benefits paid to the minor children shall be paid to the spouse; and

If the decedent is not survived by an eligible spouse but is survived by minor children, then the survivors' benefits, i.e., sixty-seven percent (67%) of the benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall be payable to the guardian of the minor children during the period of minority.

If a surviving spouse who is receiving survivors' benefits under this section remarries and the benefits are discontinued and the surviving spouse again becomes unmarried, benefits provided in this section for the spouse shall be resumed.

No surviving spouse shall be eligible to receive survivors' benefits on more than one (1) member account.

The retirement benefits and survivors' benefits provided for in this section shall be based on the salary for the judicial office last held by the member qualifying for retirement as fixed by law at the time of the member's retirement.

Entitlement to retirement compensation and survivors' benefits shall be evidenced by the certificate of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System transmitted to the executive director.

All retirement compensation and survivors' benefits shall be paid monthly from the Judges Retirement Fund.

All retirement and survivors' benefits provided by this subchapter shall be paid from the Judges Retirement Fund to be administered by the executive director and staff of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1; 2001, No. 763, § 5.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 6, provided: “The revised benefits which are adopted pursuant to this act shall be extended to current and future members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and to current retired members and current survivor annuitants of the system.”

24-8-714. Restrictions on benefits.

The sections of this subchapter are to be complementary, except that no person may take benefits under two (2) or more sections of this subchapter at the same time.

Retirement and survivors' benefits shall be measured by the salary payable for the position last held by the retired or deceased judge or justice at the time of retirement.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-715. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning redetermination of benefits, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 232, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-716. Effect on other laws.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be accumulative to all present laws pertaining to the retirement of judges of the circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery courts and of justices of the Supreme Court and shall in no way repeal, amend, or modify such laws except as otherwise specifically provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 399, § 1.

24-8-717. Redetermination of benefits.

Notwithstanding § 24-8-715 [repealed], each July 1 the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit which has been paid by the system under the Tier Two Actual Judicial Service Benefit Plan for at least twelve (12) full calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1067, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-701 — 24-8-716 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 8
— Arkansas District Judge Retirement System

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 654, § 6, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

“Pursuant to Arkansas Code § 24-4-750(c)(2), the repeal of Arkansas Code § 24-8-801 et seq. by Section 2 of this act does not affect persons who were active members of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System when the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System was abolished and transferred to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by Acts 2007, No. 177, § 1.”

Acts 2009, No. 654, § 7, provided:

“The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System shall promulgate by rule the provisions repealed by Acts 2007, No. 177, § 1, that are subject to the savings provision under § 24-4-750(c)(2).”

24-8-801 — 24-8-824. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 654, § 2. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-8-801. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-802. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 4.

24-8-803. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 5.

24-8-804. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-805. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 6.

24-8-806. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-807. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 7; 2007, No. 177, § 12.

24-8-808. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 8.

24-8-809. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 9.

24-8-810. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 10.

24-8-811. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-812. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 11.

24-8-813. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-814. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-815. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-816. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 12.

24-8-817. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-818. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-819. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 13.

24-8-820. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1.

24-8-821. Acts 2003, No. 1374, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 14.

24-8-822. Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 15.

24-8-823. Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 15.

24-8-824. Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 15.

Subchapter 9
— District Court Clerks' Retirement

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 18, as amended by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 120: Mar. 18, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System that this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 15: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this bill affects the structure of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the ideal time to make revisions to the retirement systems is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.

24-8-901. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “municipal judge's retirement fund” means a local municipal judge and clerk retirement fund established by a local government under § 24-8-301 et seq., § 24-8-401 et seq., or § 24-8-501 et seq.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1375, § 1.

24-8-902. Additional funding for district court clerks.

A local government that has established a municipal judge's retirement fund shall contribute an amount of money to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that shall represent the actuarially determined accrued liability for those court clerks and former court clerks who are covered by the municipal judge's retirement fund on December 31, 2004.

The assets of the municipal judge's retirement fund equal to the benefit obligations for the court clerks under subsection (a) of this section shall be paid to the system on January 1, 2005.

If the municipal judge's retirement fund does not have sufficient funds available to pay the benefit obligations for the court clerks under subsection (a) of this section to the system, then the remaining amount of actuarially determined accrued liability shall be paid on or before December 31 each year for up to the next thirty (30) years based on a thirty-year amortization period.

If the amount in the municipal judge's retirement fund is greater than the actuarially determined amount of the liabilities to be transferred to the system, that excess may be retained by the local government for the sole purpose of paying for the retirement benefits of district court clerks.

The accrued benefit used to determine the accrued liability under this section shall be determined by:

Calculating the benefit that the court clerk would be eligible to receive on December 31, 2004, as provided by law before January 1, 2005, if the court clerk was eligible to begin receiving benefits on January 1, 2005; and

Multiplying the amount in subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section by the number of years of eligible service and then dividing by the greater of:

The number of years of service needed to be eligible to retire; or

The current years of eligible service.

The service years are to be determined under the law before January 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1375, § 1; 2005, No. 1022, § 16; 2007, No. 177, § 13.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 1375, § 1, subsection (a) of this section began:

“If the Arkansas District Judge's Retirement System is created,”.

24-8-903. Retirement membership of district court clerks.

All municipal court clerks and district court clerks who are members of a municipal judge's retirement fund on December 31, 2004, shall become members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on January 1, 2005.

If the local government employing the district court clerk on December 31, 2004, is not a participating employer under the system, then the local government shall become a participating employer under the system for the district court clerk beginning on January 1, 2005.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1375, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 2003, No. 1375, § 1, subsection (a) of this section began:

“If the Arkansas District Judge's Retirement System is created,”.

24-8-904. Reciprocal system.

Court clerks placed in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System under this subchapter shall be covered by the reciprocal provisions of §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-404.

There is no reciprocal service between the local municipal judge retirement systems and the reciprocal systems listed in § 24-2-401(3) before January 1, 2005.

In establishing eligibility for a benefit from each system, the credited service under all reciprocal systems is totaled, and the credited service is used in determining eligibility for each system benefit.

Only the credited service under that system and the benefit formula of that system are used in determining the amount of a benefit from each system.

This subchapter is not intended to decrease the benefits earned nor increase the eligibility requirements for members who were participants in a local plan, as authorized by law, prior to January 1, 2005.

The benefits earned and those eligibility requirements shall transfer to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

If a system provides a benefit amount that is not dependent on length of credited service, the benefit amount shall be reduced to the proportion that system-credited service bears to total reciprocal system-credited service.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1022, § 17; 2007, No. 177, § 14.